Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.062

Judges—Chelan, Douglas, Clark, Grays Harbor, Kitsap, Kittitas, and Lewis counties.

There shall be in the county of Chelan four judges of the superior court; in the county of Douglas one judge of the superior court; in the county of Clark 12 judges of the superior court; in the county of Grays Harbor three judges of the superior court; in the county of Kitsap eight judges of the superior court; in the county of Kittitas two judges of the superior court; in the county of Lewis three judges of the superior court.

[ 2024 c 125 s 1; 2020 c 53 s 1; 2003 c 96 s 1; 1998 c 270 s 1; 1996 c 208 s 1; 1995 c 117 s 1; 1992 c 189 s 2; 1990 c 186 s 1; 1987 c 323 s 2; 1985 c 357 s 2; 1979 ex.s. c 202 s 2; 1977 ex.s. c 311 s 2; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 79 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 83 s 4; 1967 ex.s. c 84 s 2; 1963 c 48 s 2; 1951 c 125 s 4. Prior: 1945 c 20 s 1, part; 1927 c 135 s 1, part; 1911 c 131 s 1; 1907 c 79 s 1, part; 1907 c 178 s 1, part; 1905 c 36 s 1, part; 1895 c 89 s 1, part; 1891 c 68 s 3, part; 1890 p 341 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 11045-1d, part; RRS s 11045-1, part.]

NOTES:

Additional judicial position in Clark county subject to approval and agreement—2020 c 53 s 1: "(1) The additional judicial position created by section 1, chapter 53, Laws of 2020 is effective only if Clark county through its duly constituted legislative authority documents its approval of the additional position and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the additional judicial position as provided by state law or the state Constitution.

(2) The judicial position created by section 1, chapter 53, Laws of 2020 is effective no earlier than June 11, 2020. The actual starting date for the position may be established by the Clark county legislative authority upon request of the superior court and by recommendation of the Clark county executive authority, if any." [ 2020 c 53 s 2.]

Effective dates for additional judicial positions—2003 c 96: "(1) The additional judicial positions created by sections 1 and 2 of this act in Clark county, Kitsap county, Kittitas county, and Benton and Franklin counties shall be effective only if each county through its duly constituted legislative authority documents its approval of any additional positions and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of such additional judicial positions as provided by statute.

(2)(a) The additional judicial positions created by section 1 of this act for the county of Clark take effect as follows: One additional judicial position shall be effective no earlier than the second Monday in January 2004, and one additional position shall be effective no earlier than the second Monday in January 2005. The actual starting dates for the positions may be established by the Clark county legislative authority upon request of the superior court and by recommendation of the Clark county executive authority, if any.

(b) The additional judicial position created by section 1 of this act for the county of Kitsap shall be effective no earlier than the second Monday in January 2005. The actual starting date for the position may be established by the Kitsap county legislative authority upon request of the superior court and by recommendation of the Kitsap county executive authority, if any.

(c) The additional judicial position created by section 1 of this act for the county of Kittitas shall be effective no earlier than the second Monday in January 2004. The actual starting date for the position may be established by the Kittitas county legislative authority upon request of the superior court and by recommendation of the Kittitas county executive authority, if any.

(d) The additional judicial position created by section 2 of this act jointly for the counties of Benton and Franklin shall be effective no earlier than July 1, 2003. The actual starting date for the position may be established by the Benton and Franklin county legislative authorities upon request of the superior court and by recommendation of the Benton and Franklin county executive authorities, if any." [ 2003 c 96 s 3.]

Effective date—1998 c 270: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 1, 1998]." [ 1998 c 270 s 5.]

Additional judicial positions in Clark, Lewis, and Yakima counties—Start dates—Establishment by county commissioners upon superior court request—1998 c 270: "(1) The additional judicial position created by section 1 of this act for the county of Clark takes effect on April 1, 1998, but the actual starting date for this position may be established by the Clark county commissioners upon the request of the superior court.

(2) The additional judicial position created by section 1 of this act for the county of Lewis takes effect on April 1, 1998, but the actual starting date for this position may be established by the Lewis county commissioners upon the request of the superior court.

(3) The additional judicial positions created by section 2 of this act for the county of Yakima take effect on April 1, 1998, but the actual starting dates for these positions may be established by the Yakima county commissioners upon the request of the superior court." [ 1998 c 270 s 4.]

Additional judicial positions in Chelan and Douglas counties subject to approval and agreement—1996 c 208: "(1) The three judicial positions serving Chelan and Douglas counties jointly are allocated to Chelan county, effective upon appointment of a judge to the Douglas county superior court. The additional judicial positions created by section 1, chapter 208, Laws of 1996, are allocated one to Chelan county and one to Douglas county and each position becomes effective only if each county, through its duly constituted legislative authority, documents its approval of the additional position and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the additional judicial position as provided by state law or the state Constitution.

(2) The judicial positions created by section 1, chapter 208, Laws of 1996, shall be effective January 1, 1997." [ 1998 c 270 s 3; 1996 c 208 s 2.]

Effect—Additional judicial position in Clark county subject to approval and agreement—1995 c 117: "The additional judicial position created by section 1 of this act is effective only if Clark county through its duly constituted legislative authority documents its approval of the additional position and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the additional judicial position as provided by state law or the state Constitution." [ 1995 c 117 s 2.]

Effective dates—Additional judicial positions subject to approval and agreement—1992 c 189: See notes following RCW 2.08.061.

Effective dates—Additional judicial positions in Kitsap and Thurston counties subject to approval and agreement—1990 c 186: "(1)(a) One additional judicial position created by section 1 of this act and the additional judicial position created by section 2 of this act shall be effective July 1, 1990.

(b) The second additional judicial position created by section 1 of this act shall be effective not later than, and at the discretion of the legislative authority may be phased in at any time before, January 1, 1994.

(2) The additional judicial positions created by sections 1 and 2 of this act in Kitsap and Thurston counties shall be effective only if the county through its duly constituted legislative authority documents its approval of any additional positions and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of such additional judicial positions as provided by statute. The additional expenses include, but are not limited to, expenses incurred for court facilities." [ 1990 c 186 s 4.]

Effective dates—Additional judicial positions in King, Chelan, and Douglas counties subject to approval and agreement—1987 c 323: See note following RCW 2.08.061.

Effective dates—Additional judicial positions in Pierce, Clark, and Snohomish counties subject to approval and agreement—1985 c 357: See note following RCW 2.08.061.

Adjustment in judicial services: See note following RCW 2.08.065.

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 311: See note following RCW 2.08.061.